Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-21,246
Action involving public petition and participation; motion for summary judgment; when granted.

A motion for summary judgment shall be granted when the moving party has demonstrated that the action, claim, cross-claim, or counterclaim subject to the motion is an action involving public petition and participation unless the party responding to the motion demonstrates that the action, claim, cross-claim, or counterclaim has a substantial basis in fact and law or is supported by a substantial argument for an extension, modification, or reversal of existing law. The court shall grant preference in the hearing of such motion.

Laws 1994, LB 665, § 6.